Hawaii statutes.
§342P-26 Injunctive and other relief.
The director may institute a civil action for injunctive and other relief in
any environmental court of competent jurisdiction to prevent the violation of
this chapter, any rule adopted pursuant to this chapter, or any condition of a
permit or variance issued pursuant to this chapter, without the necessity of a
prior revocation of the permit or variance, to impose and collect civil
penalties, to collect administrative penalties, or to obtain other relief. The
environmental court may grant relief in accordance with the Hawaii rules of
civil procedure. [L 1991, c 219, pt of §1; am L 1995, c 180, §41; am L 2014, c
218, §8]

Rules of Court

Injunctions, see HRCP rule 65.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next